Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-186] Effect of amendment and
restatement. An amendment to articles of incorporation does not affect a
cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding
to which the corporation is a party, any requirement or limitation imposed upon
the corporation or any property held by it by virtue of any trust upon which
the property is held by the corporation, or the existing rights of persons
other than members of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation's
name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its
former name. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next